Illinois, session 104th, SB1218.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-6013 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-6013)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-6013)7    Sec. 3-6013. Duties, training and compensation of 8auxiliary deputies. Auxiliary deputies shall not supplement 9members of the regular county police department or regular 10deputies in the performance of their assigned and normal 11duties, except as provided herein. Auxiliary deputies may be 12assigned and directed by the sheriff to perform the following 13duties in the county:14    To aid or direct traffic within the county, to aid in 15control of natural or human made disasters, to aid in case of 16civil disorder as assigned and directed by the sheriff, 17provided, that in emergency cases which render it impractical 18for members of the regular county police department or regular 19deputies to perform their assigned and normal duties, the 20sheriff is hereby authorized to assign and direct auxiliary 21deputies to perform such regular and normal duties. 22Identification symbols worn by such auxiliary deputies shall 23be different and distinct from those used by members of the   SB1218- 2 -LRB104 03932 RLC 13956 b1regular county police department or regular deputies. In 2matters the sheriff deems essential to preventing or assisting 3with disasters or events of civil disorder, the sheriff may 4authorize plain clothes to be worn by auxiliary deputies as 5long as the auxiliary deputies are carrying proper 6identification while performing this function. Such auxiliary 7deputies shall at all times during the performance of their 8duties be subject to the direction and control of the sheriff 9of the county. Such auxiliary deputies shall not carry 10firearms, except with the permission of the sheriff, and only 11while in uniform and in the performance of their assigned 12duties.13    Auxiliary deputies, prior to entering upon any of their 14duties, shall receive a course of training in the use of 15weapons and other police procedures as shall be appropriate in 16the exercise of the powers conferred upon them under this 17Division, which training and course of study shall be 18determined and provided by the sheriff of each county 19utilizing auxiliary deputies, provided that, before being 20permitted to carry a firearm an auxiliary deputy must have the 21same course of training as required of peace officers in 22Section 2 of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm 23Training Act. The county authorities shall require that all 24auxiliary deputies be residents of the county served by them. 25Prior to the appointment of any auxiliary deputy his or her 26fingerprints shall be taken and no person shall be appointed   SB1218- 3 -LRB104 03932 RLC 13956 b1as such auxiliary deputy if he or she has been convicted of a 2felony or other crime involving moral turpitude.3    Auxiliary deputies may receive such compensation as is set 4by the County Board, with the advice and consent of the 5Sheriff, not to exceed the lowest hourly pay of a full-time 6sworn member of the regular county police or sheriff's 7department and not be paid a salary, except as provided in 8Section 3-6036, but may be reimbursed for actual expenses 9incurred in performing their assigned duty. The County Board 10must approve such actual expenses and arrange for payment.11    Nothing in this Division shall preclude an auxiliary 12deputy from holding a simultaneous appointment as an auxiliary 13police officer pursuant to Section 3-6-5 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code.15(Source: P.A. 97-379, eff. 8-15-11; 98-725, eff. 1-1-15.)